Mississippi, session 2026, HB215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the State Department of Mental Health for the purpose of increasing the number of alcohol and drug rehabilitation beds and the number of crisis intervention teams in the state, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ............................................... $ 10,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  The Department of Mental Health shall allocate the funds appropriated under Section 1 of this act as follows: (a)  Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall be expended by the department for increasing the number of alcohol and drug rehabilitation beds in facilities under the jurisdiction of the department; and (b)  Seven Million Dollars ($7,000.000.00) shall be distributed to community mental health centers for increasing the number of alcohol and drug rehabilitation beds in the centers and for establishing additional crisis intervention teams as provided in Section 41-21-133, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.